Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 4.1. Popular Election of School Board in Counties with County Manager Plan of Government.

§ 22.1-47.1.
Applicability.

The provisions of Article 7 (§ 22.1-57.1 et seq.) of this chapter shall be applicable, except as otherwise specifically provided in this article, to any school division comprised of a county having the county manager plan of government.

History.

1993, c. 88.

§ 22.1-47.2.
Petitions for a referendum on direct election of school board members.

Petitions circulated pursuant to § 22.1-57.2 or 22.1-57.4 may be circulated for a period not to exceed one calendar year. If the period from the date of the earliest signature to the latest signature exceeds one calendar year, all signatures shall be invalid.

At the time the petitions are filed, the petitions shall contain the required number of signatures of voters who are currently registered to vote in the county.

Persons signing petitions for a referendum to be held at the November general election shall date their signatures on the petitions.

History.

1993, c. 88; 2022, c. 355.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 in the former penultimate paragraph, deleted “1994” following “November” and “and on subsequent November general election dates” following “general election”; and deleted the former last paragraph, which read: “Any petition circulated pursuant to § 22.1-57.2 or this article which calls for a November 1993 referendum (i) shall not be subject to the requirements of this section that the signatures be dated and that the petition be circulated no longer than one calendar year and (ii) may be circulated for signatures in both 1992 and 1993.”

§ 22.1-47.3.
Transition from appointed to elected school board.

If the change to an elected school board is approved by the voters, the appointed members of the school board in office at the time of the referendum approving the change shall continue in office for the balance of their appointed terms except that each term shall expire on the December 31 immediately succeeding the June 30 expiration date for the appointed term. In the event of a vacancy in an unexpired term of any appointed school board member, a replacement shall be elected at the next regularly scheduled general election to fill the remainder of the term. No special election shall be held, however, if the general election at which it is to be held is scheduled in the year in which the term expires.

At the first and each succeeding November election, one school board member shall be elected for each position on the school board occupied by an appointed member whose term expires the following December 31 until the school board is composed entirely of elected members. Successor school board members shall be elected each November for four-year terms commencing on January 1 of the year following the election. The requirement of subsection B of § 22.1-57.3 that the same number of members of the governing body and school board be elected at each November election shall not be applicable.

History.

1993, c. 88; 1996, c. 185.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 718, effective March 25, 2013, provides: “§ 1. Notwithstanding § 22.1-47.3 of the Code of Virginia or any other provision of law to the contrary, the terms of the members currently appointed to the Northampton County School Board shall be shortened or lengthened to expire on December 31, 2013.

“Notwithstanding § 22.1-47.3 of the Code of Virginia or any other provision of law to the contrary, the terms of the members of the Northampton County School Board to be elected in the November 2013 general election shall be staggered as follows: four members to be elected to fill the vacancies in Districts 1, 2, and 3 and one at-large position for a term of four years and three members to be elected to fill the vacancies in Districts 4 and 5 and the other at-large position for a term of two years. All such terms shall commence on January 1, 2014. After the initial staggering of terms, members shall be elected for a term of four years.”

§ 22.1-47.4.
Benefits, expenses, and reimbursements for the school board members of certain county.

An elected school board of a school division comprised of a county having the county manager plan of government may, in accordance with the procedures applicable to the setting of its salary, grant itself fringe benefits, expenses, and reimbursements, or any of them, as it deems appropriate, and in the manner and form as such fringe benefits, expenses, and reimbursements are provided for school board employees. Such school board serving a county having the county manager plan of government whose membership totals five may establish such fringe benefits, expenses, and reimbursements by July 1 in any year in which two of the five members are to be elected. Any such fringe benefits, expenses, and reimbursements shall become effective on January 1 of the following year.

History.

2004, c. 532; 2006, c. 126.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 126, in the first sentence, inserted “in accordance with the procedures applicable to the setting of its salary” and deleted “after satisfying the notice and public hearing requirements as set forth in §

15.2-702.1

” at the end.